New York, session 2025-2026, A9651.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 2500-n to read as follows: 3 § 2500-n. Maternal health monitoring pilot program. 1. As used in this 4 section: 5 (a) "Eligible participant" means a patient who meets all of the 6 following criteria: 7 (i) the patient is a recipient of medical assistance; 8 (ii) the patient is a member of a participating managed care organiza- 9 tion; and 10 (iii) the patient is pregnant. 11 (b) "Escalation pathway" means an agreement between the participating 12 managed care organizations and the technology vendor on a process to 13 follow when an eligible participant's measurements are concerning and 14 warrant further review and investigation. 15 (c) "Health care provider" means an obstetrician or maternal fetal 16 medicine physician who meet all of the following criteria: 17 (i) such person is licensed in the state of New York; 18 (ii) such person is an in-network provider for the participating 19 managed care organizations; and 20 (iii) such person provides care for an eligible participant during 21 pregnancy. 22 (d) "Participating managed care organization" means a managed care 23 organization selected by the department to administer the pilot program. 24 (e) "Pilot program" means the maternal health monitoring pilot program 25 established by this section. 26 (f) "Remote monitoring clinical care team" means a group made up of 27 nurses licensed to practice in New York state, dietitians, and certified 28 diabetes education specialists who are monitoring eligible participants' EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14280-01-5 A. 9651 2 1 measurements, and providing nutrition guidance, diabetes and hyperten- 2 sion condition management counseling, and pregnancy and postpartum 3 advice. 4 (g) "Remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and maternal 5 diabetes" means technology provided by the technology vendor that: 6 (i) collects health data from an eligible participant and electron- 7 ically transmits that information securely for interpretation and recom- 8 mendation; 9 (ii) uses devices that are authorized by the U.S. Food and Drug Admin- 10 istration; 11 (iii) monitors health data, including blood pressure, weight, blood 12 glucose levels, or other physiological health data as determined by the 13 eligible participant's health care provider; 14 (iv) transmits health data through cellular networks; and 15 (v) provides preprogrammed equipment specifically for each eligible 16 participant. 17 (h) "Technology vendor" means a technology company selected by the 18 department to contract with the participating managed care organizations 19 in administering the pilot program. 20 2. (a) A maternal health monitoring pilot program is hereby estab- 21 lished within the department to offer eligible participants improved 22 maternal health care through remote patient monitoring for maternal 23 hypertension and maternal diabetes. The department shall select one or 24 more participating managed care organizations and one technology vendor 25 to administer the pilot program in a manner to be determined by the 26 department. 27 (b) Each participating managed care organization shall contract 28 directly with the technology vendor to offer remote patient monitoring 29 for maternal hypertension and maternal diabetes and ensure that eligible 30 participants have access to the pilot program. 31 (c) The technology vendor shall meet the following requirements when 32 offering remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension and mater- 33 nal diabetes to an eligible participant under the pilot program: 34 (i) ensuring that remote patient monitoring for maternal hypertension 35 and maternal diabetes is possible during pregnancy and for up to three 36 months postpartum; 37 (ii) ensuring that a remote patient monitoring device is delivered to 38 each eligible participant; 39 (iii) ensuring that each eligible participant is trained on how to use 40 the remote patient monitoring device; 41 (iv) assigning a program manager to support the implementation and 42 administration of the program and to coordinate efforts with the partic- 43 ipating managed care organizations and the department; and 44 (v) employing a remote monitoring clinical care team that is capable 45 of: 46 (A) monitoring and reviewing eligible participant's health data; 47 (B) creating an escalation pathway with the participating managed care 48 organizations if the eligible participant's remote patient monitoring 49 readings, in conjunction with the eligible participant's symptoms, 50 require additional medical attention; 51 (C) providing health coaching to participants in matters including 52 nutrition, condition management, and healthy behavior modification; and 53 (D) coordinating with the eligible participant's health care provider 54 as needed. 55 3. (a) The department shall implement the pilot program in as many 56 counties as necessary to ensure participation of up to five hundred A. 9651 3 1 eligible participants. The program must include counties that are 2 considered maternity care deserts based on the March of Dimes latest 3 maternity care desert report. 4 (b) The pilot program shall be operational no later than one hundred 5 eighty days after the contract date between the participating managed 6 care organization and the technology vendor. The pilot program will 7 conclude two years after the pilot program is operational. 8 4. The department shall pay a fee to the participating managed care 9 organizations to administer the pilot program. The participating managed 10 care organizations shall use the fee payment to cover the costs of 11 contracting with the technology vendor and administering the pilot 12 program. The department shall provide six hundred thousand dollars to 13 offset the costs of the pilot program. 14 5. (a) Within two years of the pilot program's implementation, the 15 department shall collaborate with the participating managed care organ- 16 izations and any other relevant stakeholders to develop a report on 17 evaluating the outcomes of the pilot program. The report will look at 18 available data of program participants, including claims data, vital 19 stats data, EHR/EMR data, to determine the pilot program's impact on the 20 following maternal, fetal and neonatal health outcomes to determine 21 whether the program improves maternal, fetal and neonatal health and 22 whether the program will lead to savings to Medicaid. 23 (b) Maternal outcomes to be considered shall include maternal mortal- 24 ity rate, severe maternal morbidity rate, incidences of preeclampsia, 25 the cesarian section rate, the mean length of the eligible participants' 26 hospital stays, the intensive care unit admission rate, the mean length 27 of the intensive care unit stay, and the postpartum hospital readmission 28 rate. Fetal/Neonatal outcomes to be considered shall include the fetal 29 mortality rate, the rate of fetal growth restriction, the neonatal 30 mortality rate, the NICU admissions rate, the mean length of NICU stay, 31 the rate of neonatal hypoglycemia, the preterm birth rate, the gesta- 32 tional age at delivery, and the birthweight. 33 (c) The report will include recommendations regarding whether the 34 pilot program should be expanded throughout New York. 35 (d) The department shall submit the report to the governor, the presi- 36 dent of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the chair of the assem- 37 bly committee on health, the chair of the assembly committee on insur- 38 ance, the chair of the senate committee on health, the chair of the 39 senate committee on insurance and the chair of the senate committee on 40 women's issues. 41 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 42 have become a law.